Alabama, session 2026rs, HB600.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the Skilled Trades Workforce Recovery Program Act.
Section 2. The purpose of this act is to increase
workforce participation in high-demand skilled trades by
expanding access to affordable training and incentivizing
employer-based apprenticeships, especially in rural and
economically distressed areas.
Section 3. For purposes of this act, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) DEPARTMENT. The Department of Workforce.
(2) ELIGIBLE PROGRAM. A trade certification program in
fields identified as high-need by the department.
(3) RURAL AREA. A jurisdiction designated by the
department as rural based on population thresholds and
distance from major urban centers.
Section 4. (a) Subject to the Legislature appropriating
funds for this purpose, the department shall establish and
administer the Tuition-Free Technical Training for Priority
Trades Program. The purpose of the program is to reimburse
public community colleges and technical schools for tuition
costs incurred by students who reside in rural areas and are
enrolled in eligible programs. The purpose of this program is
Page 2

enrolled in eligible programs. The purpose of this program is
HB600 INTRODUCED
to cover full tuition at two-year public institutions of
higher education for these students.
(b) Students must maintain satisfactory academic
progress, as determined, by the department, to remain eligible
and must complete the program within three years.
Section 5. (a) Subject to the Legislature appropriating
funds for this purpose, the department shall establish and
administer the Rural Apprenticeship Incentive Fund to provide
grants to employers in rural areas who sponsor registered
apprenticeships in high-demand fields such as welding,
transport requiring commercial driver licenses, electrical,
and HVAC.
(b) The department shall provide grants of up to five
thousand dollars ($5,000) per apprentice to employers in rural
areas who:
(1) Sponsor registered apprenticeships recognized by
the U.S. Department of Labor or the Department of Workforce;
and
(2) Employ the apprentice for at least one year.
(c) Grants may be used for wages, training materials,
or program administration.
(d) The department may adopt rules as necessary to
implement this section.
Section 6. (a) Subject to the Legislature appropriating
funds for this purpose, the department shall establish and
administer the Tools and Transportation Assistance Program.
The department shall provide stipends of up to one thousand
dollars ($1,000) per recipient to reimburse for:
Page 3

dollars ($1,000) per recipient to reimburse for:
HB600 INTRODUCED
(1) Required tools and safety equipment;
(2) Reliable transportation to job sites or training
centers.
(b) Funds shall be distributed based on financial need
and distance from the training site.
(c) The department may adopt rules as necessary to
implement this section.
Section 7. (a) Subject to the Legislature appropriating
funds for this purpose, the department shall design and
implement the Skilled Trades Education and Outreach Campaign
to fund a statewide campaign to promote trade careers to high
school students, parents, and job seekers.
(b) The Skilled Trades Education and Outreach Campaign
shall:
(1) Promote awareness of skilled trade careers; and
100 (2) Highlight pathways through community colleges,
101 apprenticeships, and credentialing programs.
102 (c) Materials shall be distributed through high
103 schools, career centers, and digital platforms.
104 (d) The department may adopt rules as necessary to
105 implement this section.
106 Section 8. (a) Subject to the Legislature appropriating
107 funds for this purpose, the department shall establish and
108 administer the Fast-Track Credential Recognition Initiative
109 Program to expedite recognition of prior work experience and
110 military training toward trade certifications.
111 (b) The department shall work with credentialing bodies
112 to develop a system for recognizing:
Page 4

to develop a system for recognizing:
HB600 INTRODUCED
113 (1) Prior work experience;
114 (2) Military occupational training; and
115 (3) Related nondegree credentials.
116 (c) The program shall offer accelerated pathways to
117 trade certification based on documented prior learning.
118 (d) The department may adopt rules as necessary to
119 implement this section.
120 Section 9. This act shall become effective on July 1,
121 2026.
Page 5